Louisiana, session 2026, HB994.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 883.2(D) is hereby amended and
reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 883.2(E) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 883.2. Restitution to victim
* * *
D.(1) The court, upon motion of the district attorney, may order anyone who
is convicted of vehicular homicide as provided in R.S. 14:32.1 to pay restitution to
the child of the victim until the child reaches eighteen years of age.
(2) If restitution is ordered pursuant to this Paragraph, the court shall
calculate the restitution payments based on the loss of income of the deceased parent
or legal guardian using the guidelines set forth in R.S. 9:315 et seq.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2089 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 994
(3) Restitution ordered pursuant to this Paragraph shall be deducted from a
civil judgment if the surviving parent or legal guardian of the child brings a civil
action against the offender and obtains a judgment in favor of the surviving parent
or legal guardian.
(4)(a) If a defendant who is ordered to pay restitution pursuant to this
Paragraph is unable to pay because of imprisonment, the defendant shall commence
payment upon the immediate occurrence of either of the following:
(i) The release of the defendant from incarceration for any reason that
includes but is not limited to completion of sentence or diminution of sentence for
good behavior as provided in R.S. 15:571.3.1. The defendant shall begin making
payments no later than one year from the date of the defendant’s release from
incarceration.
(ii) The admittance of the defendant into a work release program
administered by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections pursuant to Title
15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. Wages of the defendant are subject
to garnishment in order to satisfy the restitution ordered pursuant to this Paragraph.
(b) The defendant may enter into a payment plan to address any arrearage
that exists on the date of the defendant’s release from imprisonment or admittance
into a work release program.
(c) The defendant shall pay all arrearages unless the child of the victim
reaches eighteen years of age during the duration of the defendant's imprisonment.
(5) The payment of restitution that is ordered pursuant to this Paragraph shall
be enforced in accordance with Article 886.
E. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if the
defendant is found to be indigent and therefore unable to make restitution in full at
the time of conviction, the court may order a periodic payment plan pursuant to the
provisions of Article 875.1.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2089 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 994
Section 2. R.S. 14:32.1(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§32.1. Vehicular homicide
* * *
E. In addition to the penalties provided in this Section, a person convicted
pursuant to this Section may be ordered to make restitution in accordance with Code
of Criminal Procedure Article 883.2.